Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 32.1-330.
Long-term services and supports screening required.

As used in this section, “acute care hospital” includes an acute care hospital, a rehabilitation hospital, a rehabilitation unit in an acute care hospital, or a psychiatric unit in an acute care hospital.

Every individual who applies for or requests community or institutional long-term services and supports as defined in the state plan for medical assistance services may choose to receive services in a community or institutional setting. Every individual who applies for or requests community or institutional long-term services and supports shall be afforded the opportunity to choose the setting and provider of long-term services and supports.

Every individual who applies for or requests community or institutional long-term services and supports shall be screened prior to admission to such community or institutional long-term services and supports to determine his need for long-term services and supports, including nursing facility services as defined in the state plan for medical assistance services. The type of long-term services and supports screening performed shall not limit the long-term services and supports settings or providers for which the individual is eligible.

If an individual who applies for or requests long-term services and supports as defined in the state plan for medical assistance services is residing in a community setting at the time of such application or request, the screening for long-term services and supports required pursuant to subsection C shall be completed by a long-term services and supports screening team that includes a nurse, social worker or other assessor designated by the Department who is an employee of the Department of Health or the local department of social services and a physician who is employed or engaged by the Department of Health.

If an individual who applies for or requests long-term services and supports as defined in the state plan for medical assistance services is receiving inpatient services in an acute care hospital at the time of such application or request and will begin receiving long-term services and supports as defined in the state plan for medical assistance services pursuant to a discharge order from an acute care hospital, the screening for long-term services and supports required pursuant to subsection C shall be completed by the acute care hospital in accordance with the screening requirements established by the Department.

If an individual who applies for or requests long-term services and supports as defined in the state plan for medical assistance services is receiving skilled nursing services that are not covered by the Commonwealth’s program of medical assistance services in an institutional setting following discharge from an acute care hospital, the Department shall require qualified staff of the skilled nursing institution to conduct the long-term services and supports screening in accordance with the requirements established by the Department, with the results certified by a physician prior to the initiation of long-term services and supports under the state plan for medical assistance services.

In any jurisdiction in which a long-term services and supports screening team described in subsection D or E has failed or is unable to perform the long-term services and supports screenings required by subsection D or E within 30 days of receipt of the individual’s application or request for long-term services and supports under the state plan, the Department shall enter into contracts with other public or private entities to conduct such long-term services and supports screenings in addition to or in lieu of the long-term services and supports screening teams described in subsections D and E.

The Department shall require all individuals who perform long-term services and supports screenings pursuant to this section to receive training on and be certified in the use of the long-term services and supports screening tool for eligibility for community or institutional long-term services and supports provided in accordance with the state plan for medical assistance services prior to conducting such long-term services and supports screenings.

The Department shall report annually by August 1 to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Education and Health regarding (i) the number of long-term services and supports screenings for eligibility for community and institutional long-term services and supports conducted pursuant to this section and (ii) the number of cases in which the Department or the public or private entity with which the Department has entered into a contract to conduct such long-term services and supports screenings fails to complete such long-term services and supports screenings within 30 days.

History.

1984, c. 781; 1990, c. 716; 2003, c. 480; 2014, cc. 285, 413; 2015, c. 542; 2017, c. 749; 2019, c. 430; 2020, cc. 304, 365.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1984 act having been 32.1-327.2.

Cross references.

As to participation by local board of social services in nursing home pre-admission screenings of individuals pursuant to §

32.1-330

, see §

63.2-1602

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 413, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Medical Assistance Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2017, c. 749, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Medical Assistance Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2020, cc. 304 and 365, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall consider alternative assessment tools for long-term services and supports screenings completed on or after July 1, 2021. The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall report its findings and conclusions to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Education and Health by December 1, 2020.”

Acts 2020, cc. 304 and 365, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Medical Assistance Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2020, cc. 304 and 365, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective if they conflict with any provision of federal law or regulation or guidance issued by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 313 TT 1, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding §

32.1-330

of the Code of Virginia, the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall improve the preadmission screening process for individuals who will be eligible for long-term care services, as defined in the state plan for medical assistance. The community-based screening team shall consist of a licensed health care professional and a social worker who are employees or contractors of the Department of Health or the local department of social services, or other assessors contracted by the department. The department shall not contract with any entity for whom there exists a conflict of interest. For community-based screening for children, the screening shall be performed by an individual or entity with whom the department has entered into a contract for the performance of such screenings.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 480 added “or a team of licensed physicians, nurses, and social workers at the Woodrow Wilson Rehabilitation Center (WWRC) for WWRC clients only” at the end of the next-to-last sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 285, effective March 24, 2014, inserted “or other Department-designated assessor” following “social worker.”

The 2014 amendment by c. 413 inserted “or other assessor designated by the Department” and added the last sentence. The third sentence has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 542 substituted “Wilson Workforce and Rehabilitation” for “Woodrow Wilson Rehabilitation” in the third sentence.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 749, designated the existing paragraph as subsection A, and added subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 430 added the second paragraph to subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 304 and 365 are identical, and rewrote the section.

§ 32.1-330.01.
Reports related to long-term services and supports.

The Department shall (i) develop a program for the training and certification of individuals who perform long-term services and supports screenings for community and institutional long-term services and supports provided in accordance with the state plan for medical assistance services and ensure that all screeners are trained on and certified in the use of the long-term services and supports screening tool for long-term services and supports screening, (ii) develop guidelines for a standardized long-term services and supports screening process for community and institutional long-term services and supports provided in accordance with the state plan for medical assistance services and ensure that all long-term services and supports screenings are performed in accordance with such guidelines, (iii) establish and monitor performance according to established standards, and (iv) strengthen oversight of the long-term services and supports screening process for community and institutional long-term services and supports to ensure that problems are identified and addressed promptly.

The Department shall require managed care organizations that provide managed long-term services and supports in the Commonwealth to develop the portion of the plan of care addressing the type and amount of long-term services and supports for each recipient. For recipients of long-term services and supports, the managed care organization shall participate in and collaborate with the existing interdisciplinary care team planning process already established pursuant to federal law and regulations in the development of the care plan.

The Department shall work with its actuary to (i) ensure that trends are consistent with Actuarial Standards of Practice, including consideration of negative historical trends in medical spending by managed care organizations to be carried forward when setting capitation rates paid to managed care organizations through the managed care program where appropriate, and (ii) annually rebase administrative expenses per member per month for projected enrollment changes and future program changes impacting administrative costs beginning in Fiscal Year 2019.

The Department shall include additional financial and utilization reporting requirements in contracts with managed care organizations and the Managed Care Technical Manual, including requirements for submission of (i) income statements that show medical services expenditures by service category, (ii) statements of revenues and expenses, (iii) information about related party transactions, and (iv) information about service utilization metrics, and shall monitor data submitted by managed care organizations to identify undesirable trends in spending and service utilization and work with managed care organizations to address such trends.

The Department shall (i) establish a compliance enforcement review process and apply consistent and uniform compliance standards in accordance with the Managed Care Technical Manual, managed care contracts, and federal standards; (ii) return all compliance feedback to managed care organizations within the same reporting or auditing period in which such reports were generated; (iii) review the reasons for which the Commonwealth will mitigate or waive sanctions imposed on managed care organizations that fail to fulfill contract requirements and review and consider infractions due to unforeseen circumstances beyond the managed care organization’s control, infractions occurring during the first year of the managed care organization’s operation, infractions occurring for the first time, and infractions that are self-reported by the managed care organization; (iv) when applicable, include guidance in the Managed Care Technical Manual for managed care organizations that state the reasons for which sanctions may be mitigated or waived; (v) include information about the number of sanctions mitigated or waived and the reasons for such mitigation or waiver in its monthly compliance reports; and (vi) annually review the results of its contract compliance enforcement action process and include information about the process and results, including the percentage of points and fines mitigated or waived and the reasons for mitigating them for each managed care organization, in its annual report.

The Department shall (i) incrementally increase the amount of performance incentive awards granted to managed care organizations that meet certain performance goals to create a stronger incentive for managed care organizations to improve performance and (ii) retain at least one metric related to chronic conditions in the performance incentive award program.

The Department shall work collaboratively with managed care organizations and relevant stakeholders, where appropriate, to annually publish a uniform and agreed-upon managed care organization report card for the Department for the managed care program and shall make such information available to new enrollees as part of the enrollment process.

Upon the inclusion of behavioral health services in the managed care program and implementation of managed long-term services and supports, the Department shall require all managed care organizations participating in the managed care program to provide to the Department information about (i) the managed care organization’s policies and processes for identifying behavioral health providers who provide services deemed to be inappropriate to meet the behavioral health needs of the individual receiving services and (ii) the number of such providers that are disenrolled from the managed care provider’s provider network.

The Department shall develop a process that allows managed care organizations providing services through the managed care program to determine utilization control measures for services provided but includes monitoring of the impact of utilization controls on utilization rates and spending to assess the effectiveness of each managed care organization’s utilization control measures.

The Department shall include language in contracts for managed care long-term services and supports requiring managed care organizations providing services through the managed care program to develop a plan that includes (i) a standardized process to determine the capacity of individuals receiving services to self-direct services received, (ii) criteria for determining when a person receiving services is no longer able to self-direct services received, and (iii) the roles and responsibilities of service facilitators, including requirements to regularly verify that appropriate services are provided.

Following inclusion of managed long-term services and supports in the managed care program, the Department shall (i) review information about utilization and spending on long-term services and supports provided by managed care organizations and work with managed care organizations to make necessary changes to managed care organizations’ prior authorization and quality management review processes when undesirable trends are identified; (ii) include revenue and expense reports, information about related party transactions, and information about service utilization metrics in contracts for managed long-term services and supports and the Managed Care Technical Manual and utilize data and information received from managed long-term services and supports providers to monitor spending and utilization trends for managed long-term services and supports and address problems related to spending and utilization of services through managed long-term services and supports program contracts or the rate-setting process; (iii) include additional requirements for information about metrics related to behavioral health services in the managed long-term services and supports contract and the Managed Care Technical Manual to facilitate identification of undesirable trends in service utilization and enable the Department to address problems identified with managed care organizations participating in the program; and (iv) include additional metrics related to the long-term services and supports in the managed long-term services and supports contract and the Managed Care Technical Manual to facilitate identification of differences between models of care, assessment of progress in and challenges related to keeping service recipients in community-based rather than institutional care, and cooperation with managed care organizations in resolving problems identified.

History.

2017, c. 749; 2020, cc. 304, 365.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 749, cls. 3 through 13 were codified, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, as subsections A through K of this section, respectively.

Acts 2017, c. 749, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Medical Assistance Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2020, cc. 304 and 365, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall consider alternative assessment tools for long-term services and supports screenings completed on or after July 1, 2021. The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall report its findings and conclusions to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Education and Health by December 1, 2020.”

Acts 2020, cc. 304 and 365, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Medical Assistance Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2020, cc. 304 and 365, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective if they conflict with any provision of federal law or regulation or guidance issued by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 304 and 365 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “long-term services and supports screenings” for “preadmission screenings” and similar language throughout, substituted “long-term services and supports” for “long-term care” throughout, inserted “services” following “state plan for medical assistance” twice, and substituted “long-term services and supports screening tool” for “uniform assessment instrument”; in subsection B, substituted the first occurrence of “long-term services and supports” for “long-term care services” and made a similar change in the second sentence; and substituted “long-term services and supports” for “long-term care services and supports” in subsections H and J and throughout subsection K.

§ 32.1-330.1.
Department to implement premium assistance program for HIV-positive individuals.

The Board of Medical Assistance Services shall from funds eligible for this purpose from Title II of the Ryan White Comprehensive AIDS Resources Emergency CARE Act (42 U.S.C. § 300ff-21 et seq.) or other funds appropriated or made available for this purpose, implement, and may promulgate any necessary regulations for implementation of, a premium assistance program for HIV-positive individuals which shall have, at minimum, the following characteristics:

Payment of health insurance premiums for individuals who are not eligible for Medicaid and who can document (i) HIV infection and inability to continue working for medical reasons and (ii) eligibility to continue their employer’s group policy pursuant to the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985;

Financial eligibility criteria allowing a maximum income of no more than 250 percent of the federal poverty guidelines and countable liquid assets of no more than $10,000 in value;

Funds eligible under Title II of the Ryan White CARE Act shall not be used toward copayments and deductible payments; and

Coverage of family members, if the HIV-infected person’s policy is the sole source of health insurance.

History.

1994, c. 200; 1996, c. 195; 2000, c. 870.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1994, c. 200, cl. 2, which provided for the expiration of this section on July 1, 1996, was repealed by Acts 1996, c. 195, cl. 2. Therefore, this section remains in effect beyond July 1, 1996.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 870 substituted “250 percent” for “200 percent” in subdivision 2.

§ 32.1-330.2.
Medicaid managed care programs; program information documents; plain language required.

As used in this section, “program information” means all forms of communication that (i) are provided to any person who is an applicant for or a recipient of medical assistance services provided by the Commonwealth pursuant to Titles XIX and XXI of the Social Security Act and (ii) describe eligibility requirements, available medical assistance services, and the rights and responsibilities of recipients of medical assistance services provided by the Commonwealth pursuant to Titles XIX and XXI of the Social Security Act.

The Board of Medical Assistance Services shall require that all program information be (i) communicated in nontechnical, readily understandable, plain language and (ii) made available in a manner that is timely and accessible to (a) individuals with limited English proficiency through the provision of language access services, including oral interpretation and written translations, and (b) individuals with disabilities through the provision of auxiliary aids services, when doing so is a reasonable step to providing meaningful access to health care coverage. A person that makes program information available may consider resources, including staffing, available to such person and the cost of responding to requests for language access or auxiliary aids services in determining the reasonableness of making program information available pursuant to this subsection.

Language access services and auxiliary aids services provided to ensure program information is accessible to individuals with limited English proficiency and individuals with disabilities shall be provided without charge to such individuals. Information regarding how to receive language access services and auxiliary aids services shall be included with program information documents on a website maintained by the Department and on the website of every state or local government agency or state agency contractor that provides program information.

Every person that provides program information shall use an objective readability measure approved by the Department to test the readability of its program information documents. The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to language that is mandated by federal or state laws, regulations, or agencies.

All program information documents within the scope of this section, and all amendments thereto, shall be made available for review upon the request of the Department. Any program information document that is exempt from the requirements of subsection B shall be accompanied by a documentation of the federal or state law, regulation, or agency mandate that authorizes the exemption.

History.

1996, c. 318; 2022, c. 775.

§ 32.1-330.3.
Operation of a PACE plan; oversight by Department of Medical Assistance Services.

As used in this section, unless the context requires a different meaning, “PACE” means of or associated with long-term care health plans (i) authorized as programs of all-inclusive care for the elderly by Subtitle I (§ 4801 et seq.) of Chapter 6 of Title IV of the Balanced Budget Act of 1997, Pub. L. No. 105-33, 111 Stat. 528 et seq., §§ 4801-4804, 1997, pursuant to Title XVIII and Title XIX of the United States Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1395eee et seq.), and the state plan for medical assistance services as established pursuant to Chapter 10 (§

32.1-323

et seq.) and (ii) which have signed agreements with the Department of Medical Assistance Services as long-term care health plans.

Operation of a PACE plan that participates in the medical assistance services program shall be in accordance with a prepaid health plan contract or other PACE contract consistent with Chapter 6 of Title IV of the federal Balanced Budget Act of 1997 with the Department of Medical Assistance Services.

All contracts and subcontracts shall contain an agreement to hold harmless the Department of Medical Assistance Services and PACE enrollees in the event that a PACE provider cannot or will not pay for services performed by the subcontractor pursuant to the contract or subcontract.

During the PACE period, the plan shall have a fiscally sound operation as demonstrated by total assets being greater than total unsubordinated liabilities, sufficient cash flow and adequate liquidity to meet obligations as they become due, and a plan for handling insolvency approved by the Department of Medical Assistance Services.

The PACE plan must demonstrate that it has arrangements in place in the amount of, at least, the sum of the following to cover expenses in the event of insolvency:

One month’s total capitation revenue to cover expenses the month prior to insolvency; and

One month’s average payment of operating expenses to cover potential expenses the month after the date of insolvency has been declared or operations cease.The required arrangements to cover expenses shall be in accordance with the PACE Protocol as published by On Lok, Inc., in cooperation with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, as of April 14, 1995, or any successor protocol that may be agreed upon between the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and On Lok, Inc.Appropriate arrangements to cover expenses shall include one or more of the following: reasonable and sufficient net worth, insolvency insurance, letters of credit, or parental guarantees.

Enrollment in a PACE plan shall be restricted to those individuals who participate in programs authorized pursuant to Title XIX or Title XVIII of the United States Social Security Act, respectively.

Full disclosure shall be made to all individuals in the process of enrolling in the PACE plan that services are not guaranteed beyond a 30-day period.

The Board of Medical Assistance Services shall establish a Transitional Advisory Group to determine license requirements, regulations, and ongoing oversight. The Advisory Group shall include representatives from each of the following organizations: Department of Medical Assistance Services, Department of Social Services, Department of Health, Bureau of Insurance, Board of Medicine, Board of Pharmacy, Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, and a PACE provider.

The Department shall develop and implement a coordinated plan to provide choice and education about the PACE program. The plan shall ensure that:

Information about the availability and potential benefits of participating in the PACE program is provided to all eligible long-term services and supports clients as part of the long-term services and supports screening process pursuant to §

32.1-330

. The client’s choice regarding participation in the PACE program shall be documented on the state long-term services and supports screening authorization form. The Department shall provide initial and ongoing training of all long-term services and supports screening teams on the PACE program.

The Department develops informational materials and correspondence, including the initial and annual enrollment letters, for use by the Department and its contractors to educate and notify potentially eligible clients about long-term services and supports. These informational materials shall include the following:

A description of the PACE program;

A statement that an eligible individual has the option to enroll in the PACE program or be automatically enrolled in a managed care organization; and

Contact information for PACE providers.

History.

1997, cc. 414, 475; 1998, c. 318; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2019, c. 419; 2020, cc. 304, 365.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 304 and 365, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall consider alternative assessment tools for long-term services and supports screenings completed on or after July 1, 2021. The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall report its findings and conclusions to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Education and Health by December 1, 2020.”

Acts 2020, cc. 304 and 365, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Medical Assistance Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2020, cc. 304 and 365, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective if they conflict with any provision of federal law or regulation or guidance issued by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, are identical, and substituted “Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “Department for the Aging” in subsection G; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 419 rewrote subsection A; added subsection B; redesignated former subsections B through G as subsections C through H; and added subsection I.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 304 and 365 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted the last paragraph, which read: “Pre-Pace” means of or associated with long-term care prepaid health plans (i) authorized by the U.S. Health Care Financing Administration pursuant to § 1903(m)(2)(B) of Title XIX of the United States Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1396b et seq.) and the state plan for medical assistance services as established pursuant to Chapter 10 (§

32.1-323

et seq.) and (ii) which have signed agreements with the Department of Medical Assistance Services as long-term care prepaid health plans”; deleted references to “pre-PACE” throughout subsections B through H; in the next to last paragraph of subsection E, substituted “Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services” for “U.S. Health Care Financing Administration” twice; in subdivision I 1, substituted “long-term services and supports screening” for “preadmission screening” three times; and made stylistic changes.

§ 32.1-330.4.
Uniform assessment instrument for PACE plans.

Every individual who requests a screening for the purpose of enrollment in a PACE plan, as defined in §

32.1-330.3

, shall be eligible for such screening, regardless of whether the individual is eligible under the state plan for medical assistance.

History.

2014, c. 413.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 413, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Medical Assistance Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

§ 32.1-330.5.
Reports related to eligibility renewal.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall provide a quarterly report to each managed care organization that is contracted with the Department to provide services through the Medicaid managed care program that specifies the medical assistance application renewal date for each recipient of medical assistance services who has been attributed to the managed care organization.

History.

2018, c. 382.

§ 32.1-331.
Repealed by Acts 1989, c. 618.

Cross references.

For current provision relating to additional civil penalty or appointment of a receiver, see §

32.1-27.1

.

§ 32.1-331.01.
Health Care Coverage Assessment Fund.

As used in this section:“Covered hospital” means any in-state private acute care hospital other than a hospital classified as a public hospital, freestanding psychiatric and rehabilitation hospital, children’s hospital, long stay hospital, long-term care hospital, or critical access hospital.“Newly eligible adult” means an individual described in 42 U.S.C. § 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII).“State Plan” means the state plan for medical assistance under Title XIX (42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.) of the Social Security Act.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Health Care Coverage Assessment Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All revenues collected or received as a result of imposition of a health care coverage assessment on covered hospitals and any other such moneys, public or private, received for the administration of the health care coverage assessment shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys deposited to the Fund shall be used solely for the nonfederal share of the cost of medical assistance for newly eligible adults, the administrative costs of collecting the assessment and implementing and operating the coverage for newly eligible adults. Such moneys shall be appropriated as provided in the general appropriation act. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director of the Department of Medical Assistance Services.

History.

2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2.

Effective date.

This section became effective July 1, 2018.

§ 32.1-331.02.
Health Care Provider Payment Rate Assessment Fund.

As used in this section:“Covered hospital” means any in-state private acute care hospital other than a hospital classified as a public hospital, freestanding psychiatric and rehabilitation hospital, children’s hospital, long stay hospital, long-term care hospital, or critical access hospital.“Managed care organization hospital payment gap” means the difference between the amount included in rates for inpatient and outpatient services provided by covered hospitals, based on historical paid claims, and the amount that would be included when hospital services are priced according to the existing State Plan methodology but using 100 percent of the adjustment factors, including the capital reimbursement percentage, and full inflation subject to approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services pursuant to 42 C.F.R. § 438.6(c).“State Plan” means the state plan for medical assistance under Title XIX (42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.) of the Social Security Act.“Upper payment limit” means the amount equal to the maximum amount of payment for inpatient services for recipients of medical assistance services established in accordance with 42 C.F.R § 447.272 and outpatient services for recipients of medical assistance services pursuant to 42 CFR § 447.321.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Health Care Payment Rate Assessment Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All revenues collected or received as a result of imposition of a health care payment rate assessment on covered hospitals and any other such moneys, public or private, received for the administration of the health care payment assessment shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys deposited to the Fund shall be used solely for the nonfederal share of the cost of payment rate actions associated with the payment rate assessment as provided in the general appropriation act and the administrative costs of collecting the assessment and of implementing and operating the associated payment rate actions. Such moneys shall be appropriated as provided in the general appropriation act. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director of the Department of Medical Assistance Services.

History.

2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2.

Effective date.

This section became effective July 1, 2018.

§ 32.1-331.03.
Process for payment directly to nursing facility or ICF/MR.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall, to the extent permitted by federal law, implement a process for payment of the nursing facility or ICF/MR share of payments directly to the nursing facility or ICF/MR rather than to the hospice care provider for hospice services furnished to an individual who is a resident of a nursing facility or ICF/MR and who would be eligible under the Commonwealth’s program of medical assistance for nursing facility services or services in an ICF/MR had he not elected hospice care. Payments made directly to a nursing facility or ICF/MR shall be the full amount that would be paid to the nursing facility or ICF/MR if the individual was not receiving hospice services, and shall not reflect any discount to such rates.

History.

2019, c. 209.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 209 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 32.1-331.04.
Personal care aides; orientation program.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall establish an orientation program for all personal care aides who provide self-directed services through the Medicaid program. The program shall have the following requirements:

Attendance shall be limited to personal care aides, consumers who utilize the services of personal care aides, home care workers’ employers of record, and worker advocacy organizations that represent personal care aides;

Orientations shall be held in-person or online at least quarterly, and personal care aides shall be invited and encouraged to attend at least one such orientation per calendar year; and

The orientation curriculum shall include content addressing operational procedures and recordkeeping, including pay and benefits; available assistance and resources; roles and responsibilities in self-direction; diversity and equity training; transparency and fraud; and worker rights and responsibilities.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services may, in its discretion, contract with another state agency to provide the orientation described in this section.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 236.

Editor’s note.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.